Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202671-2496
Prescription Drug Donation Program Act, how cited.

Sections 71-2496 to 71-24,102 shall be known and may be cited as the Prescription Drug Donation Program Act.

Laws 2024, LB1035, § 1.